Utah statutes.
17B-2a-905.   Service area board of trustees.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2):
(i)  the initial board of trustees of a service area located entirely within
the unincorporated area of a single county may, as stated in the petition or
resolution that initiated the process of creating the service area:
(A)  consist of the county legislative body;
(B)  be appointed, as provided in Section 17B-1-304; or
(C)  be elected, as provided in Section 17B-1-306;
(ii)  if the board of trustees of a service area consists of the county
legislative body, the board may adopt a resolution providing for future board
members to be appointed, as provided in Section 17B-1-304, or elected, as
provided in Section 17B-1-306; and
(iii)  members of the board of trustees of a service area shall be elected, as
provided in Section 17B-1-306, if:
(A)  the service area is not entirely within the unincorporated area of a
single county;
(B)  a petition is filed with the board of trustees requesting that board
members be elected, and the petition is signed by registered voters within the
service area equal in number to at least 10% of the number of registered
voters within the service area who voted at the last gubernatorial election;
or
(C)  an election is held to authorize the service area's issuance of bonds.
(b)  If members of the board of trustees of a service area are required to be
elected under Subsection (1)(a)(iii)(C) because of a bond election:
(i)  board members shall be elected in conjunction with the bond election;
(ii)  the board of trustees shall:
(A)  establish a process to enable potential candidates to file a declaration
of candidacy sufficiently in advance of the election; and
(B)  provide a ballot for the election of board members separate from the bond
ballot; and
(iii)  except as provided in this Subsection (1)(b), the election shall be
held as provided in Section 17B-1-306.
(2) (a)  This Subsection (2) applies to a service area created on or after May
5, 2003 if:
(i)  the service area was created to provide:
(A)  fire protection, paramedic, and emergency services; or
(B)  law enforcement service; and
(ii)  in the creation of the service area, an election was not required under
Subsection 17B-1-214(3)(c).
(b) (i)  Each county whose unincorporated area is included within a service
area described in Subsection (2)(a), whether in conjunction with the creation
of the service area or by later annexation, shall appoint three members to the
board of trustees.
(ii)  Each municipality whose area is included within a service area described
in Subsection (2)(a), whether in conjunction with the creation of the service
area or by later annexation, shall appoint one member to the board of
trustees.
(iii)  Each member appointed by a county or municipality under Subsection
(2)(b)(i) or (ii) shall be an elected official of the appointing county or
municipality, respectively.
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection 17B-1-302(2), the number of members of a board
of trustees of a service area described in Subsection (2)(a) shall be the
number resulting from application of Subsection (2)(b).
